Hawaii statutes.
§334-130 Period of assisted community
treatment. (a) The assisted community treatment order shall continue to
apply to the subject, for the duration specified in the order, regardless of
whether the treatment setting changes.

(b) A subject of assisted community treatment
is automatically and fully discharged at the end of the family court ordered
period of treatment, a period of not more than one year, unless a new family
court order has been obtained as provided hereinbelow.

(c) Nothing in this section shall preclude the
subject's stipulation to the continuance [of] an existing court order. [L 1984,
c 251, pt of §1; am L 2013, c 221, §§16, 24; am L 2016, c 114, §§5, 6]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next